Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 19 Capacity of Minor Veterans

30-19-1.
Obtaining federal loans.

Every minor of sane mind, whether or not under guardianship by reason of minority, who, under the provisions of federal law is eligible for housing loans, may, with the same force, effect, and validity as if that minor were eighteen (18) years of age with full legal capacity, enter into, make, swear to, or affirm, execute, acknowledge, and deliver any and all mortgages of real and personal property, notes, and bonds secured by mortgage and other instruments of mortgage and any and all contracts, agreements, notes, bonds, obligations, covenants, warranties, affidavits, and vouchers which may be requisite, necessary, desirable, or incident to obtaining any loan guaranteed, in part or in full, under the provisions of federal law, or to obtaining any loan, guaranty, or other benefit thereunder; and with like force, effect, and validity may contract for and purchase real and personal property and pay the consideration therefor in all cases in which part or all of the purchase price consists of the proceeds of a loan guaranteed, in part or in full, under the provisions of federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1583, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-19-1

; P.L. 1987, ch. 54, § 1.

30-19-2.
Execution of mortgages.

Without limiting the generality of §

30-19-1

, a minor veteran as described in §

30-19-1

may, with like force, effect, and validity, execute, acknowledge, and deliver mortgages of real property containing such powers of sale, conditions, and covenants as are usual in mortgages taken by savings banks in this state, or mortgages in the form authorized by chapter 11 of title 34, or mortgages containing the same, or substantially the same, powers of sale, conditions, and covenants as are set forth in §§

34-11-19

—

34-11-22

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1583, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-19-2

.

30-19-3.
Purchase of insurance.

A minor veteran may, with like force, effect, and validity, purchase and own policies of insurance relating to real or personal property mortgaged to secure any loan described in §

30-19-1

and may make any policy payable in case of loss to any holder of any mortgage on the property, and may endorse any check, draft, order, or negotiable instrument made payable to such minor in connection with that loan.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1583, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-19-3

.

30-19-4.
Power to receive proceeds of guaranteed loan.

The funds loaned on any housing loan guaranteed, in part or in full, under the provisions of federal law may be paid over by the lender to the minor receiving that loan or at the direction of the minor and no person or corporation making payment of those funds shall be responsible for the proper application thereof, and prior to the application of those funds to any purchase or other purpose of that loan, any guardian of the minor shall not have, or be entitled to, the title, possession, or management of those funds and shall not inventory or account for them as part of the estate of the minor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1583, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-19-4

.

30-19-5.
Powers of minor spouse.

Any minor spouse of any person who under the provisions of federal law is eligible for housing loans and whether or not under guardianship by reason of minority, may, with the same force, effect, and validity as if he or she were eighteen (18) years of age with full legal capacity do all that a minor veteran is empowered to do under §§

30-19-1

—

30-19-3

, and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, join with the minor veteran in the execution and delivery of any mortgage or other instrument that may be requisite, necessary, desirable, or incidental to the obtaining of any loan guaranteed, in part or in full, under the provisions of federal law, or to the obtaining of any loan, guaranty, or other benefit thereunder, and, in that mortgage or other instrument, may release curtesy or dower in any property described in the mortgage or other instrument.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1583, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

30-19-5

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 42.

30-19-6.
Supersession of other law — Liberal construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall be given full effect notwithstanding the provisions of §

33-15-13

or any other provisions of law contrary to the provisions of this chapter. This chapter shall be construed liberally so as to enable eligible veterans who are minors and their spouses and the minor spouses of eligible veterans to possess full legal capacity to obtain housing loans guaranteed under or provided under federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1583, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

30-19-6

.